District of Columbia statutes.
16-2827

Confidentiality.

(a)

The mediation session shall be confidential. All proceedings at the mediation, including any statement made by any party, attorney, or other participant, shall be privileged and shall not be construed as an admission against interest. Any statement at such proceedings shall not be used in court in connection with the case or any other litigation. A party shall not be bound by anything said or done at the mediation unless a settlement is reached.

(b)

A mediator shall not be compelled to provide evidence of a mediation communication in any subsequent trial.

History

Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-263, § 302, 54 DCR 807